Louisiana, session 2026, HB997.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 43:141(A), 145, 150, and 171(A)(1) and (2)(introductory paragraph)
are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 43:141(C) and 171(A)(4) are hereby enacted to
read as follows:
§141. Official journal to be selected by police juries, city and parish councils,
municipal corporations, and school boards
A. The police juries, city and parish councils, municipal corporations, and
school boards in all the parishes, the parish of Orleans excepted, at their first meeting
in June of each year, shall select a newspaper or its official website as the official
journal for their respective parishes, towns, or cities for a term of one year.
* * *
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1551 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 997
C. If a police jury, city or parish council, municipal corporation, or school
board selects its official website as its official journal, it may also publish in a
newspaper a copy of the official proceedings and public notices that it is required to
publish in its official journal.
* * *
§145. Municipalities to select newspaper located within their boundaries
Municipal corporations shall select an official journal If a municipal
corporation selects a newspaper as its official journal, the newspaper shall be
published in an office physically located within their municipal boundaries if a
newspaper as defined in R.S. 43:140(3) is published therein. If no qualified
newspaper is published within the municipal boundaries, a newspaper published in
the parish of the municipal corporation which meets the requirements of a newspaper
as defined in R.S. 43:140(3) shall be selected.
* * *
§150. Official journal; notification of secretary of state
Prior to January 1, 1985, and at least thirty days after effecting any change
in its official journal, each parish, municipality, and school board shall file with the
secretary of state the name and address or the web address of its official journal, the
effective date of the selection, and the period for which the selection is effective. For
purposes of meeting the requirements of Article III, Section 13 of the Constitution
of Louisiana, the official journal on file with the secretary of state shall be the
official journal of the parish, municipality, or school board.
* * *
§171. Selection of newspaper official journal
A.(1) Levee, drainage, subdrainage, road, subroad, navigation, and sewerage
districts, or other political subdivisions of the state and parishes, shall select a
newspaper or its official website as the official journal for the political subdivision.
The political subdivision shall publish in its official journal have the proceedings of
their board and such financial statements required by and furnished to the legislative
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1551 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 997
auditor published in a newspaper. The newspaper official journal shall be selected
at their first meeting in June of each year for a term of one year.
(2) The If the official journal is a newspaper, the newspaper:
* * *
(4) If a levee, drainage, subdrainage, road, subroad, navigation, or sewerage
district, or other political subdivision selects its official website as its official journal,
it may also publish in a newspaper a copy of the official proceedings and public
notices that it is required to publish in its official journal.
* * *